src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages

# North Saami adjective declension file

## Bisyllabic adjectives

* **LEXICON BUORRE**  For this adj only

* **LEXICON BUOROT** SUB, Southern dialect

* **LEXICON ALKI**  Bisyll V-Adj, -es-Attr, no WeG.

* **LEXICON SEARRA** Bisyll. V-Adj's with s-Attr in WeG.

* **LEXICON HOHPI** Bisyll. V-Adj's with s-Attr. in WeG & Adv.

* **LEXICON LAIKI** Bisyll. V-Adj's with es-Attr. in WeG & Adv.

* **LEXICON LODJI** bisyll V-Adj with -es and -is Attr in WeG

* **LEXICON JUHKKIS** Bisyll. V-Adj. with s-Attr; no Adv.

* **LEXICON HAHTTI** Bisyll. V-Adj. no Adv. !sponsors wants comparatives for these!

* **LEXICON EADDJI** Bisyll. V-Adj. no Adv.

* **LEXICON NUORRA** Bisyll. V-Adj. w/CG, w/o Sep. Attr; no Adv.

* **LEXICON RIEKTA**  Bisyll adj w/o obl sg forms, WeG Attr

* **LEXICON VIELG**  adj with -es -attrib. (cns final adj)

* **LEXICON VIELGAT**  just a sublexicon to VIELG

* **LEXICON VIELG_NOCOMP**  adj with -es -attrib. (cns final adj)

* **LEXICON VIELGAT_NOCOMP**  just a sublexicon to VIELG_NOCOMP

* **LEXICON RIEKTAT**  -at final adj with attr -es and -dis

* **LEXICON CAHKK**  -at final adj with attr -es and -dis

* **LEXICON JALGAT**  only jalgat, attr jalga and jalges

* **LEXICON UHCC**  uhcci, unni, seaggi, attr uhca, unna, seakka

* **LEXICON UNN**  uhcci, unni, seaggi, attr uhca, unna, seakka

* **LEXICON JEAGOHEAPMI**  caritives

* **LEXICON BIVNNUHEAPME**  no bivnnuhis here, special, beacause popular and unpopular collide in attribute form :)

* **LEXICON JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP**  caritives, no comparative

* **LEXICON OATNI**  only this adj, no attr

## Consonant-final even-syllabic adjectives

* **LEXICON TUVRRAHAS**

* **LEXICON ISSORAS**  issoras and certain as-adj. also derivations, final -s

* **LEXICON IHKALAS-DABALAS** loan adjectives ending on -ihkalaš - kritihkalaš etc

* **LEXICON IIVVAL-DABALAS** loan adjectives ending on -iivvalaš

* **LEXICON ISTTALAS** loan adjectives ending on -ihkalaš

* **LEXICON DABALAS**   -laš adjectives with short Attr and SgNom Comp forms - dábálet, dábálut etc

* **LEXICON NVDCompAttr_ISSORASSA-**  sublexicon to DABALAS

* **LEXICON LAS_OBL** 

* **LEXICON DEARVVASLAS**  -laš adjectives without short Attr and SgNom Comp forms. The word dearvvaslaš/dearvvašlaš is not directed here, but to DABALAS

* **LEXICON DEARVVASLAS2**  only to lift out ISSORASSA-, see DEARVVASLAS

* **LEXICON STUORIBUS**  -buš comparatives

* **LEXICON ASEHAS**  5 words with -is attr: asehis, asihis, oanehis, vuollegis, vuolligis

* **LEXICON UNOHAS**  for this word only

* **LEXICON IPMAHA** Tris. Gradating C-adj:s, The Troms declension: imaš:ipmaha, gáđaš:gáhtaha

## Trisyllabic adjectives

* **LEXICON MEAHTTUS**  meahttun-adj. with comp. and superl. forms -seabbo, -seamos etc.

* **LEXICON BEAKKAN** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. without Separate Attr.

* **LEXICON BEAKKAN_NOCOMP** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. without Separate Attr. No comparatives

* **LEXICON GEARDAN** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. without Separate Attr.

* **LEXICON JOHTIL** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. with is-Attr.

* **LEXICON RAHKAT** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. with is-Attr. TO AVOID RAHKADIT

* **LEXICON HEITTOHA** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. with is-Attr.

* **LEXICON GUOHCA** Trisyll. Gradating V-Adj., no sep. Attr.

* **LEXICON GARAS** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a-Attr. and final s Pred

* **LEXICON LINIS** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a-Attr. and final s Pred

* **LEXICON SUVRRIS** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. weak grade a-Attr. and final s Pred

* **LEXICON NANUS** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. weak grade u-Attr. and final s Pred

* **LEXICON LOSSAT** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a-Attr. and final t  Pred. geahppat and lossat, words with bisyllable form comparatives in addition to trisyllable form: geahpit, losit

* **LEXICON CAVGAT** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a/es-Attr. and final t Pred, both -but and -eappot comparatives

* **LEXICON CIENAL** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Strong Grade is-Attr.

* **LEXICON NJUORAS** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj., with Strong Grade a-Attr.

* **LEXICON DILDDAS**  ,-ld-(#=is) Trisyll Grad., facult is-Attr.

* **LEXICON VUOGAS**  Trisyll. adj. with gradation I-III and no sep. attr. only this word, vuogas, vuohkkasat

* **LEXICON HEAHKAS**  ,-hkk-#=is heahkka Trisyll Grad., is-Attr & heahkka

* **LEXICON EATTAS**  ,-dd-#=is Trisyll. Grad. C-Adj. with WeG -is Attr.

* **LEXICON BOAKKAS**  ,-gg-#boagge9- Trisyll no attr

* **LEXICON FARGAT**  :d#Ø Trisyll no attr

* **LEXICON GAPPUS**  -bbo- Trisyll, attr same as pred

* **LEXICON VATTIS**  Trisyll CG, -es/-is Attr

* **LEXICON BIEKKUS**  ,-iggo-#=is Trisyll Grad, is-Attr,

* **LEXICON LIEKKUS**  ,-iggo-(#=is) Trisyll Grad,  attr same as pred

* **LEXICON GUOROS**  guoros and luovos, Trisyll Grad,  attr same as pred

* **LEXICON NUOLUS**  ,-u8llo-(#nuolo9s)

* **LEXICON GEARGGUS**  ,-ergo-#gearggo9s

* **LEXICON VUDDJII**

* **LEXICON VUDDJII_DECLINED** misses most cases

* **LEXICON JIEDNAI**

* **LEXICON JIEDNAI_DECLINED** misses most cases

* **LEXICON NJOLVAI** njolvái #njolvás. No further declination, ref. Nielsen's dictionary.

* **LEXICON BOARIS**  As GAPPUS, but with different attr.

* **LEXICON BOARIS_NOCOMP**

* **LEXICON IIDNA_NOCOMP**   

* **LEXICON IIVA_NOCOMP**  IIVA_A without comparatives

* **LEXICON IIVA_A**  loans ending with -a, same attr as pred

* **LEXICON FRIIJA**  loans ending with -a, same attr as pred

* **LEXICON BOREALA** FRIIJA without comparatives

* **LEXICON SPANSKA** spánska, dánska, fránska, ránska. WeG attr

* **LEXICON ALLAT** allat, gassat, govdat, attr: alla, gassa, govda. Trisyllables with Bisyllable compforms: alit, gasit, govddit

* **LEXICON ALLAGA** sublexicon to ALLAT and word árrat

## Contracted adjectives

* **LEXICON FIINNIS**  ,-dná-(:Ø)#fiinna, western comp: fiidnát, eastern comp: fiidnásabbo/-sut/-sat

* **LEXICON DEAHTIS**  as fiinnis, but with StrGr in Attr

* **LEXICON SMAVIS**  as deahtis, but with even more Attr forms and comparative smávit in addition

* **LEXICON STUORIS**  As fiinnis, but with different comparation

* **LEXICON NJALGGAT** Comp+Sg+Nom: njálgát, njálgásut/-sit/-sut/-sat, njálgáseabbo/-sabbo

* **LEXICON CAPPIS**  western comp: čábbát, eastern comp: čábbásabbo/-sut/-sat

* **LEXICON VIISSIS**  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -es/-is, western and eastern comp forms

* **LEXICON RAHPIS**  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -es, with long and short comp forms

* **LEXICON HARVVIS_CGforms**  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -e, short comp forms

* **LEXICON HARVVIS**  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -e, short comp forms

* **LEXICON MALLASadj-**

* **LEXICON MALLASadj-_MINIP**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags

* **LEXICON MALLASI-/NUORABUadj-**

* LEXICON DEVNVCASE  bisyllabic nominal declension

* LEXICON GOAHTI-OBLadj

* **LEXICON GOAHTI-ADJ_CGforms** Bisyll. V-Adjs. Forms that usually get CG. This lexicon is mostly meant for adding Err/Orth forms wihtout CG to lemmas, which should have CG, 

* **LEXICON GOAHTI-NEadj**

* **LEXICON GODIIadj-**

* **LEXICON GOADIadj-**

* **LEXICON NomVadj**

* **LEXICON EssVadj**

## Special cases

* **LEXICON VEARATAG**

* **LEXICON VEARA**

## Final note on the adjective sublexica

todo: Rewrite the adj lexica so that the attr variation is kept separate
from the otherwise uniform declension.

* **LEXICON VUDDJI-**

* **LEXICON BOHCCOadj**

* **LEXICON BOHCCUadj**

# Adjective declension

* **LEXICON ATTR**  This is the normal lexicon for ATTR forms

* **LEXICON ATTRCONT**  This lexicon is for forms with non-sub Attr, where we sub the rest.

* **LEXICON LAIKI0**  Directing adjectives ...

* **LEXICON ISSORASSA-**

* **LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS** comparision for trisyllable adjectives

* **LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_MINIP**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags

* **LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT**

* **LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT_MINIP** for giving Use/NGminip-tags

* **LEXICON EAMOS_MINIP**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags

* **LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted** for certain contracted adjectives, divided dialectwise

* **LEXICON SHORTCOMP**

* **LEXICON SHORTCOMP_MINIP**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags

* **LEXICON SHORTCOMP_PRED_MINIP**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags

* **LEXICON EABBU** eastern form -abbo as well

* **LEXICON EABBUCASE1**

* **LEXICON EABBUCASE2**

* **LEXICON EABBU_ERRforms**

* **LEXICON EABBU_MINIP**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags

* **LEXICON EABBUCASE1_MINIP**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags

* **LEXICON EABBUCASE2_MINIP**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags

* **LEXICON BU/MUS**  Bisyllabic adjectives comparision

* **LEXICON BUStem**

* **LEXICON EAMOS** eastern form -amos as well

* **LEXICON EAMOS_ERRforms** eastern form -amos as well

* **LEXICON GAPPUS0** Almost id. to MALIS0. MALIS0 has no VUOHTA, GAPPUS0 has no Px Ess., and shouldn't have either.

GOAL: Keep GAPPUS- and MALLAS- apart, because of
the Px(1)V issue, but unify the rest.
GAPPUS- and MALLAS- differ
in the A and N treatment of
Pl Nom Px (only 1st p. for A
and all persons for N).
Now that MALLASI- is deleted,
GAPPUS- and MALLAS- are
identical. We check by pointing
GAPPUS- to MALLAS-. Look into this.
and remove GAPPUS- for MALLAS-
eventually.

* **LEXICON MEAHTTUN** Deverbal adjectives.

* **LEXICON LEXATTR_GEAHTES** trisyllabic stems: geahtes for trisyll, heapmi for bisyll

* **LEXICON LEXATTR_GEAHTES_Hum** trisyllabic stems: geahtes for trisyll, heapmi for bisyll

* **LEXICON GEAHTES**  geahtes for trisyll, heapmi for bisyll

* **LEXICON OVDDIT** Inherently comparative adjectives, bisyll

* **LEXICON MADDELEABBO** Inherently comparative adjectives, trisyll

# Nominal derivation

## Noun derivation

* **LEXICON VUOHTA** +CmpN/SgG

* **LEXICON VUOHTAMORPH**

# Adjective derivation

* **LEXICON LAS** from verbs: čirrolas, bealkálas etc

* **LEXICON BUOREMUSS** superlatives, from bisyll adjectives

* **LEXICON BUOREMUS**

* **LEXICON BUOREMUSSA-**

* **LEXICON HEAPMI** caritives

* **LEXICON LAGAN** lágan, lágán and subform lagan as well

* **LEXICON LAGAS** lágaš, lágáš and subform lagaš as well

* **LEXICON LAGAN_LAGAS**

* **LEXICON AHKASAS** derived words on -saš, -haš, -laš, no comp

* **LEXICON AHKASAS_PL**  derived words on -saš, -haš, -laš, only plural,

* **LEXICON SISKKALDAS** olgguldas, siskkáldas, siskkildas, nuppáldas, that's all

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1** caritives and their derivatives (huvva, huhtti), from bisyll nouns

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1Long** caritives and their derivatives (huvva, huhtti), from bisyll nouns without vowel shortening

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1Short** caritives and their derivatives (huvva, huhtti), from bisyll nouns with vowel shortening

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsV2** from bisyllables, muoralaš, gieđalaš etc

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsV2_lasj** from bisyllables, muoralaš, gieđalaš etc

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsC** from trisyllables, -laš and caritives on -heapme

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsCLong** from trisyllables, -laš and caritives on -heapme

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsCShort** from trisyllables, -laš and caritives on -heapme

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsV3** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG !from Propernames

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsV3case** from bisyllabic propers

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsC2** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG	!from Propernames

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsC2case** from trisyllabic propers

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsV4** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG  from Propernames

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsV4case** from bisyllabic propers (subbed)

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsC3** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG	 !from Propernames

* **LEXICON DenominalAdjsC3case** from trisyllabic propers (subbed)

* **LEXICON LASJOBL**

* **LEXICON HEAPMIOBL** sublexicon not only for caritives on -heapmi/-heapme

## Adverbs from adjectives

* **LEXICON ADVV** adverb from bilysll stems

* **LEXICON ADVC** adverb from trilysll stems

## Adjectives from nouns
